Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB127.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) Refusing to accept cash payment for the retail sale of goods or services having a sale price of less than five hundred dollars ($500) when the purchaser is physically present 1234567891011121314151617181920 at the point of sale. This subclause does not apply to the retail sale of goods or services where the seller has a written policy that currency in excess of a certain denomination will not be accepted as payment and has posted the policy conspicuously for purchasers to view prior to the point of sale and the purchaser tenders cash payment in a denomination that exceeds the amount specified in the policy.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0127PN0108 - 2 - 123456789